California statutes. Unemployment Insurance Code
 Armed Forces of the United States when these meetings are necessary due to circumstances arising from the covered active duty or call to covered active duty of the spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the Armed Forces of the United States.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “activities of daily living” include adaptive activities, such as caring appropriately for one’s grooming and hygiene, bathing, dressing, and eating. Instrumental activities of daily living include, but are not limited to, cooking, cleaning, shopping, taking public transportation, paying bills, maintaining a residence, using telephones and directories, and using a post office.

(j) Any other activities to address other events that arise out of the covered active duty or call to covered active duty of the spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the
 Armed Forces of the United States, provided that the employer and employee agree that this leave shall qualify as an exigency, and agree to both the timing and duration of this leave.

(k) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2021.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 849, Sec. 5.   (SB 1123)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Section operative January 1, 2021, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

3303.

(a) On and after July 1, 2014, only if the director makes both of the findings described in subdivision (b), an individual shall be deemed eligible for family temporary disability insurance benefits equal to one-seventh of their weekly benefit amount on any day in which the individual is unable to perform their regular or customary work because of any of the following:

(1) The individual is bonding with a minor child during the first year after the birth or placement of the child in connection with foster care or adoption.

(2) The individual is caring for a seriously ill child, parent, grandparent, grandchild, sibling, spouse,
 or domestic partner.

(3) The individual is participating in a qualifying exigency related to the covered active duty or call to covered active duty of the individual’s spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the Armed Forces of the United States.

(b) An individual shall be deemed eligible for family temporary disability insurance benefits described in subdivision (a) only if the director finds both of the following:

(1) The individual has made a claim for temporary disability benefits as required by authorized regulations.

(2) The individual has filed a certificate, as required by Sections 2708 and 2709, or for purposes of participating in a qualifying exigency
 related to the covered active duty or call to covered active duty of the individual’s spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the Armed Forces of the United States, has provided the information requested pursuant to Section 3307.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until July 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 772, Sec. 5.   (SB 590)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of July 1, 2028, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 6 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 772.)
-------------------------------------------

3303.

(a) On and after July 1, 2028, only if the director makes both of the findings described in subdivision (b), an individual shall be deemed eligible for family temporary disability insurance benefits equal to one-seventh of their weekly benefit amount on any day in which the individual is unable to perform their regular or customary work because of any of the following:

(1) The individual is bonding with a minor child during the first year after the birth or placement of the child in connection with foster care
 or adoption.

(2) (A) The individual is caring for a seriously ill child, parent, grandparent, grandchild, sibling, spouse, domestic partner, or designated person.

(B) When an individual requests for the first time family temporary disability insurance benefits to care for a designated person, the individual shall do both of the following:

(i) The individual shall identify the designated person.

(ii) The individual shall, under penalty of perjury, attest to either of the following:

(I) How the individual is related by blood to the designated person.

(II) How the individual’s association with the designated person is the equivalent of a family relationship.

(3) The individual is participating in a qualifying exigency related to the covered active duty or call to covered active duty of the individual’s spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the Armed Forces of the United States.

(b) An individual shall be deemed eligible for family temporary disability insurance benefits described in subdivision (a) only if the director finds both of the
 following:

(1) The individual has made a claim for temporary disability benefits as required by authorized regulations.

(2) The individual has filed a certificate, as required by Sections 2708 and 2709, or for purposes of participating in a qualifying exigency related to the covered active duty or call to covered active duty of the individual’s spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the Armed Forces of the United States, has provided the information requested pursuant to Section 3307.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1,
 2028.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 5) and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 772, Sec. 6.   (SB 590)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

3303.1.

(a) An individual is not eligible for family temporary disability insurance benefits with respect to any day that any of the following apply:

(1) The individual has received, or is entitled to receive, unemployment compensation benefits under Part 1 (commencing with Section 100) or under an unemployment compensation act of any other state or of the federal government.

(2) The individual has received, or is entitled to receive, “other benefits” in the form of cash benefits as defined in Section 2629.

(3) The individual has received, or is entitled to receive, state disability
 insurance benefits under Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601) or under a disability insurance act of any other state.

(4) Another family member, as defined in Section 3302, is ready, willing, and able and available for the same period of time in a day that the individual is providing the required care or participating in a qualifying exigency related to the covered active duty or call to covered active duty of the individual’s spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the Armed Forces of the United States.

(b) An individual who is entitled to leave under the FMLA and the CFRA shall take Family Temporary Disability Insurance (FTDI) leave concurrent with leave taken under the FMLA and the CFRA.

(c) (1) As a condition of an employee’s initial receipt of family temporary disability insurance benefits during any 12-month period in which an employee is eligible for these benefits, an employer may require an employee to take up to two weeks of earned but unused vacation leave prior to the employee’s initial receipt of these benefits.

(2) This subdivision may not be construed in a manner that relieves an employer of any duty of collective bargaining the employer may have with respect to the subject matter of this subdivision.

(3) This subdivision shall not apply to any period of disability commencing on or after January 1, 2025.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 949, Sec. 1.   (AB 2123)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3304.

(a) Eligible workers shall receive benefits in accordance with provisions established under this division.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until Section 3304.5 is incorporated in the Employment Development Department’s integrated claims management system as part of the EDDNext project, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 876, Sec. 7.   (SB 1090)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally operative by its own provisions.    Repealed conditionally by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

3304.5.

(a) The department shall issue the initial payment for family temporary disability insurance benefits under this chapter to a monetarily eligible claimant who is otherwise determined by the department as eligible to receive those benefits within 14 days of receipt of the claimant’s properly completed first family temporary disability insurance claim or as soon as eligibility begins, whichever occurs later.

(b) This section shall become operative when
 incorporated into the
 Employment Development Department’s integrated claims management system as part of the EDDNext project.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 876, Sec. 8.   (SB 1090)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally operative by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

3305.

If the director finds that any individual falsely certifies the medical condition of any person in order to obtain family temporary disability insurance benefits, with the intent to defraud, whether for the maker or for any other person, the director shall assess a penalty against the individual in the amount of 25 percent of the benefits paid as a result of the false certification. The provisions of Article 8 (commencing with Section 1126) of Chapter 4 of Part 1, with respect to assessments, the provisions of Article 9 (commencing with Section 1176) of Chapter 4 of Part 1, with respect to refunds, and the provisions of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1701) of Part 1, with respect to collections, shall apply to the assessments provided by this section. Penalties collected under this section shall be deposited in the contingent fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 343.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

3306.

(a) The director may request additional medical evidence to supplement the first or any continued claim if the additional evidence can be procured without additional cost to the care recipient. The director may require that the additional evidence include any or all of the following information:

(1) Identification of diagnoses.

(2) Identification of symptoms.

(3) A statement setting forth the facts of the care recipient’s serious health condition that warrants the participation of the employee. The statement shall be completed by any of the following people:

(A) The physician or practitioner treating the care recipient.

(B) The registrar, authorized medical officer, or other duly authorized official of the hospital or health facility treating the care recipient.

(C) An examining physician or other representative of the department.

(b) Except as provided in Section 2709, the director may require the care recipient to submit to reasonable examinations for the purpose of determining all of the following:

(1) Whether a serious health condition exists.

(2) Whether a care provider’s participation is warranted.

(3) The period of time that the care provider’s participation is warranted.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 797, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Benefits payable on or after July 1, 2004, as prescribed by Sec. 28 of Ch. 797.)
-------------------------------------------

3307.

(a) When an employee requests for the first time leave because of a qualifying exigency arising out of the covered active duty or call to covered active duty or notification of an impending call or order to covered active duty of the employee’s spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the Armed Forces of the United States, the department may require the employee to provide a copy of the covered active duty orders or other documentation issued by the military that indicates that the employee’s spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent is in the Armed Forces of the United States, is on covered active duty or call to covered active duty status, and the dates of the covered active duty service. This information need only be provided to the department. A copy of new active duty orders or other documentation issued by the military
 may be required by the department if the need for leave because of a qualifying exigency arises out of a different covered active duty or call to covered active duty or notification of an impending call or order to covered active duty of the same or a different eligible family member.

(b) The department may require that a request for paid family leave for any qualifying exigency specified in Section 3302.2 be supported by sufficient information from the employee that sets forth the following:

(1) A statement or description, signed by the employee, of appropriate facts regarding the qualifying exigency for which paid family leave is requested. The facts shall be sufficient to support the need for leave and may include information on the type of qualifying exigency for which
 leave is requested and any available written documentation that supports the request for leave. For example, this information may include a copy of a meeting announcement for informational briefings sponsored by the military, a document confirming an appointment with a counselor or school official, or a copy of a bill for services for the handling of legal or financial affairs.

(2) The approximate date of the commencement or pending commencement of the qualifying exigency.

(3) If an employee requests leave because of a qualifying exigency for a single, continuous period of time, the beginning and end dates for that leave.

(4) If an employee requests leave because of a qualifying exigency on an intermittent basis, an estimate of the frequency and duration of the qualifying exigency.

(5) If the qualifying exigency involves meeting with a third party, appropriate contact information for the individual or entity with whom the employee is meeting, including, but not limited to, the name, title, organization, address, telephone number, fax number, and email address, if available, and a brief description of the purpose of the meeting.

(6) If the qualifying exigency involves rest and recuperation leave, a copy of the rest and recuperation orders for the employee’s spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the Armed Forces of the United States, or other documentation issued by the military that indicates that this person has been granted rest and recuperation leave, and the dates of that rest and recuperation leave.

(c) If an employee submits complete and sufficient information to support
 the employee’s request for leave because of a qualifying exigency, the department may not request additional information from the employee. However, if the qualifying exigency involves meeting with a third party, the department may contact the individual or entity with whom the employee is meeting for purposes of verifying a meeting or appointment schedule and the nature of the meeting between the employee and the specified individual or entity. The employee’s permission is not required in order to verify meetings or appointments with third parties, but no additional information may be requested by the department. The department also may contact an appropriate unit of the Department of Defense to request verification that an individual is on covered active duty or call to covered active duty or has been notified of an impending call or order to covered active duty. No additional information may be requested, and the employee’s permission is not required.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2021.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 348, Sec. 2.   (AB 2399)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Section operative January 1, 2021, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

3308.

(a) In addition to English, the department shall distribute the application for family temporary disability insurance benefits in all non-English languages spoken by a substantial number of non-English-speaking applicants. As used in this section, “substantial number of non-English-speaking applicants” has the same meaning as “substantial number of non-English-speaking people” is defined in Section 7296.2 of the Government Code. 

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 386, Sec. 1.   (AB 406)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Section operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. EXTENDED UNEMPLOYMENT COMPENSATION [3501. - 3751.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [3501. - 3506.]

3501.

The purpose of this part is to compensate in part for the added wage loss sustained by individuals because of the extended duration of unemployment during prolonged periods of cyclical and technological unemployment in California. This part may be cited as the “Miller-Collier Act.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2035.)
-------------------------------------------

3502.

(a) Except as otherwise provided, the provisions and definitions of Part 1 of this division apply to this part. In case of any conflict between the provisions of Part 1 and the provisions of this part, the provisions of this part shall prevail with respect to extended unemployment compensation.

(b) Except as otherwise provided, subdivision (d) of Section 1253, and Sections 1030, 1032, 1254, 1277, 1281, 1327, 1328, 1329, 1330, and 1331 do not apply to this part.

(c) The provisions of Part 2 of this division do not apply to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2035.)
-------------------------------------------

3503.

For the purposes of this part:

(a) “Extended duration benefits” means the extended unemployment compensation benefits payable under this part.

(b) “Normal benefits” means the unemployment compensation benefits payable under Part 1 (commencing with Section 100) of this division.

(c) “Exhaustee” means an individual who is not entitled to normal benefits due to either of the following:

(1) He or she has an unexpired benefit year and has exhausted his or her normal benefits.

(2) His or her most recent benefit year expired in the week in which he or she filed a primary claim or in the immediately preceding 13 calendar weeks and he or she is not entitled to establish a benefit year.

(d) “Insured unemployment rate” for a week means the percentage arrived at by dividing:

(1) The average weekly number of individuals filing claims for regular compensation for weeks of unemployment with respect to the period consisting of the week and the immediately preceding 12 weeks, by

(2) The average monthly covered employment for the same period.

The director shall interpret this definition in accordance with regulations and guidelines prescribed by the United States Secretary of Labor which are applicable to subdivision (e) of Section 203 of the federal act.

(e) “Extended benefit period” means the period beginning with the third week after the first week for which there is an “on” indicator, and ending with the third week after the first week for which there is an “off” indicator, except no extended benefit period shall last for a period of less than 13 consecutive weeks and no extended benefit period may begin before the 14th week after the close of a prior extended benefit period. There is an “on” indicator for a week if the insured unemployment rate equals or exceeds 6 percent. There is an “off” indicator for a week if the insured unemployment rate is less than 6 percent.

(f) “Primary claim” means the first claim for extended duration benefits filed by an exhaustee with an effective date within an extended benefit period for the purpose of establishing an extended duration award and an extended duration period.

(g) “Extended duration award” means the maximum amount of extended duration benefits allowable under this part to an eligible exhaustee.

(h) “Extended duration period” means a period beginning with the first day of the week with respect to which an exhaustee filed a valid primary claim and ending with the last week which begins on or before the last day of the fifth calendar month following the calendar month which contains the extended duration week or a major portion of the extended duration week in which the valid primary claim was filed.

(i) “Parent benefit year” means the benefit year with respect to which an individual becomes an exhaustee.

(j) “Federal act” means the “Federal-State Extended Unemployment Compensation Act of 1970”.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1073, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

3504.

The director shall during the week immediately preceding each calendar week compute the insured unemployment rate for that calendar week. The computation shall be a public record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1073, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

3505.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, no payment of extended duration benefits shall be made to any individual for any week or part of any week with respect to which he is entitled to receive unemployment compensation benefits as a result of participation by this state pursuant to the provision of any federal law providing for the payment of such benefits or as a result of the application in any other manner to this state of any federal law providing for the payment of such benefits.

(b) With respect to weeks commencing on or after November 29, 1970, this subdivision shall apply and subdivision (a) of this section shall not apply to benefits under the “Federal-State Extended Unemployment Compensation Act of 1970”. 

(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, if an individual would have rights to receive benefits under the federal act within an “extended benefit period” under the federal act, the director shall cancel such individual’s rights to extended duration benefits within that “extended benefit period”.

(2) A cancellation under this section does not affect extended duration benefits paid with respect to a week preceding such cancellation.

(3) Notwithstanding a cancellation under this section, an individual otherwise qualified for extended duration benefits during an “extended benefit period” under the federal act, may, upon the expiration of his “eligibility period” specified by the federal act, establish rights to, and be paid, extended duration benefits subject to the following conditions:

(A) If the individual has filed a primary claim in the “extended benefit period”, under the federal act, he may reestablish his extended duration benefit rights, if the extended duration period would not have expired.

(B) If the individual has not filed a primary claim in the “extended benefit period”, under the federal act, and he has claimed benefits pursuant to the federal act during an extended duration week in such “extended benefit period”, he may file a primary claim effective with that extended duration week, if the extended duration period would not have expired.

(C) If the individual has not filed a primary claim in the “extended benefit period”, under the federal act, and he has claimed benefits pursuant to the federal act but not during an extended duration week in such “extended benefit period”, he may file a primary claim in an extended duration week.

(D) The individual shall not be paid extended duration benefits for any week for which he receives federal benefits.

(4) An individual may be paid extended duration benefits with respect to a parent benefit year only to the extent that the total amount of such extended duration benefits and benefits paid under the federal act since the beginning of such parent benefit year does not exceed 13 times his weekly benefit amount or one-half of the maximum amount of normal benefits payable to him during that parent benefit year, whichever is the lesser.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1156.)
-------------------------------------------

3506.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, the Governor may, if permitted by federal law, suspend the payment of extended duration benefits under this part, to the extent necessary to ensure that otherwise eligible individuals are not denied, in whole or in part, the receipt of emergency unemployment compensation benefits authorized by the federal Emergency Unemployment Compensation Act of 1991 (P.L. 102-164) or any extension of that act, including, but not limited to, Public Law 102-244, and that the state receives maximum reimbursement from the federal government for the payment of those emergency benefits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 22, Sec. 1.   Effective April 1, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Extended Duration Benefits [3551. - 3751.]



  ARTICLE 1. Eligibility and Disqualifications [3551. - 3553.]

3551.

Extended duration benefits are payable from the Unemployment Fund to unemployed individuals who are eligible under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2035.)
-------------------------------------------

3552.

An unemployed individual is eligible to receive extended duration benefits with respect to any week only if the director finds that:

(a) An extended duration award has been established for the individual.

(b) The week is:

(1) Within the extended duration period of the award; and

(2) Within an extended benefit period.

(c) He or she meets the eligibility requirements of Part 1 (commencing with Section 100) of this division, except those excluded under subdivision (b) of Section 3502.

(d) He or she is not subject to disqualification, and is not under disqualification for normal benefits, under any provision of Part 1 (commencing with Section 100) of this division.

(e) He or she had earnings from employment subject to the provisions of this division which exceed 40 times his or her most recent weekly benefit amount in the base period in which he or she exhausted all rights to regular compensation. 

For the purpose of this section “wages” includes wages due to an individual but unpaid within the time limit provided by law.

(f) During any week within an extended benefit period under the federal act, the provisions of subdivision (d) of Section 4552 and Sections 4553, 4554, 4555, and 4556 shall apply to claims filed under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 761, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

3553.

The filing of a valid primary claim by an exhaustee shall constitute an election by him to claim extended duration benefits to the exclusion of filing a new claim for normal benefits for any week of unemployment subsequent to the filing of such primary claim for which extended duration benefits are payable to him.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2035.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Computation (Amount and Duration) [3601. - 3603.]

3601.

An exhaustee’s weekly benefit amount under an extended duration award shall be the same as his weekly benefit amount for the parent benefit year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2035.)
-------------------------------------------

3602.

An exhaustee’s extended duration award during any one extended duration period shall be 13 times his weekly benefit amount or one-half of the maximum amount of normal benefits payable to him during his parent benefit year, whichever is the lesser.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2035.)
-------------------------------------------

3603.

Only one extended duration award may be established for an exhaustee based on any one parent benefit year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2035.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Filing, Determination, and Payment of Extended Duration Benefit Claims [3651. - 3656.]

3651.

Claims for extended duration benefits shall be made as provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2035.)
-------------------------------------------

3652.

An exhaustee who desires to claim extended duration benefits shall file a valid primary claim. A primary claim for extended duration benefits shall be valid only if its effective date is within an extended benefit period and the individual filing it is an unemployed exhaustee. For the purpose of determining whether a primary claim is a “valid primary claim” within the meaning of this section, an individual otherwise unemployed shall be deemed unemployed even though wages, as defined in Section 1252, which are for a period subsequent to the termination of performance of services are payable with respect to the week for which the individual files the claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1073, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

3653.

The effective date of a valid primary claim shall be determined in the same manner as the effective date of a new claim for normal benefits pursuant to Section 1326.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2035.)
-------------------------------------------

3654.

The department shall give a notice of the filing of a primary claim or an additional claim to the employing unit by which the exhaustee was last employed immediately preceding the filing of the claim unless the additional claim is the result of the filing of a partial claim as defined by the department, there has not been a subsequent employing unit which is designated as the last employer, and there is no separation issue. The employing unit so notified shall submit within 10 days after the mailing of the notice any facts then known which may affect the exhaustee’s eligibility for extended duration benefits. The 10-day period may be extended for good cause. If after the 10-day period the employing unit acquires knowledge of facts which may affect the eligibility of the exhaustee and those facts could not reasonably have been known within the period, the employing unit shall within 10 days of acquiring that knowledge submit those facts to the department, and the 10-day period may also be extended for good cause.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 716, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

3654.1.

(a) For the purpose of determining whether an unemployed individual meets the eligibility requirements of subdivision (e) of Section 3552, the director may pursuant to his authorized regulations require that wage and employment information shall be submitted to the director, within 10 days after the mailing of a request by the director, by any or all of the following:

(1) Each employing unit subsequent to the end of the base period of the new claim and prior to the effective date of a valid primary claim for extended duration benefits.

(2) Each employing unit in the four quarters immediately preceding the beginning of the base period of the new claim.

(b) The 10-day period may be extended for good cause.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

3654.2.

Any employing unit who fails to furnish wage information requested by the director pursuant to Section 3654.1 shall be subject to a penalty of ten dollars ($10) for each such report not submitted. The director shall assess the penalty and the provisions of Part 1 (commencing with Section 100) of this division with respect to assessments, refunds, and collections shall apply. Penalties collected under this section shall be deposited in the Unemployment Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

3654.3.

If any employing unit fails to respond to a request for wage information within the period prescribed by Section 3654.1, the director shall make a determination based upon available information.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

3654.4.

(a) The department shall consider the facts submitted by an employing unit pursuant to Section 3654.1 and make a determination as to the exhaustee’s eligibility for extended duration benefits under subdivision (e) of Section 3552. The department shall promptly notify the exhaustee and any employing unit who prior to the determination has submitted any facts pursuant to Section 3654.1 of the determination and the reasons therefor. The exhaustee and the employing unit may appeal therefrom to an administrative law judge within 30 days from service of notice of the determination. The 30-day period may be extended for good cause. The director shall be an interested party to any appeal.

(b) “Good cause,” as used in this section, shall include, but not be limited to, mistake, inadvertence, surprise, or excusable neglect.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2015.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 67, Sec. 34.   (SB 191)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3655.

(a) The Employment Development Department shall consider the facts submitted by an employer pursuant to Section 3654 and, if benefits are claimed subsequent to the filing of the extended duration benefits claim, make a determination as to the exhaustee’s eligibility for the extended duration benefits. The Employment Development Department shall promptly notify the exhaustee and any employer who prior to the determination has submitted any facts pursuant to Section 3654 of the determination and the reasons therefor. The exhaustee and the employer may appeal therefrom to an administrative law judge within 30 days from service of notice of the determination. The 30-day period may be extended for good cause. The Director of Employment Development shall be an interested party to any appeal.

(b) “Good cause,” as used in this section, shall include, but not be limited to, mistake, inadvertence, surprise, or excusable neglect.

(c) This section shall take effect on July 1, 2015.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 67, Sec. 35.   (SB 191)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3656.

(a) Upon the filing of a valid primary claim by an exhaustee, the department shall promptly make an extended duration award computation that shall set forth the maximum amount of extended duration benefits potentially payable during the extended duration period, the weekly benefit amount, and the expiration date of the extended duration period. The department shall promptly notify the exhaustee of the computation. The exhaustee may, within 30 days after the service of the notice of computation, protest its accuracy. The 30-day period may be extended for good cause. The department shall consider the protest and shall promptly notify the exhaustee of the recomputation or denial of recomputation. An appeal may be taken from a notice of denial of recomputation in the manner prescribed in Section 3655. The director shall be an interested party to any appeal.

(b) “Good cause,” as used in this section, shall include, but not be limited to, mistake, inadvertence, surprise, or excusable neglect.

(c) This section shall take effect on July 1, 2015.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 67, Sec. 36.   (SB 191)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Reserve Accounts [3701. - 3702.]

3701.

(a) (1) An employer that is entitled under Section 3654 to notice of the filing of a primary claim or additional claim and that, within 10 days after mailing of the notice, submits to the department any facts within its possession disclosing whether the exhaustee left the most recent employment with the employer voluntarily and without good cause or was discharged from the employment for misconduct connected with their work, or whether the claimant was a student employed on a temporary basis and whose employment began within, and ended with their leaving to return to school at the close of, their vacation period, or whether the claimant left the employer’s employ to accompany their spouse or domestic partner to a place or join their spouse at a place from which it is impractical to commute to the employment, and to which a transfer of the claimant by the employer is not available, or whether the claimant’s discharge or quit from their most recent employer was the result of an irresistible compulsion to use or consume intoxicants, including alcoholic beverages, or whether the claimant left the employer’s employ to protect their family or themselves from domestic violence abuse, or whether the claimant left the employer’s employ to take a substantially better job, shall be entitled to a ruling as prescribed by this section. The period during which the employer may submit these facts may be extended by the director for good cause.

(2) For purposes of this section, “spouse” includes a person to whom marriage is imminent, and “domestic partner” includes a person to whom a domestic partnership, as described in Section 297 of the Family Code, is imminent.

(b) The department shall consider these facts together with any information in its possession. If the employer is entitled to a determination pursuant to Section 3655, the department shall
 promptly notify the employer of its ruling as to the cause of the termination of the exhaustee’s most recent employment. The employer may appeal from a ruling or reconsidered ruling to an administrative law judge within 30 days after service of notice of the ruling or reconsidered ruling. The 30-day period may be extended for good cause, which shall include, but not be limited to, mistake, inadvertence, surprise, or excusable neglect. The director shall be an interested party to an appeal. The department may for good cause reconsider a ruling or reconsidered ruling within either five days after the date an appeal to an administrative law judge is filed or, if an appeal is not filed, within 30 days after service of notice of the ruling or reconsidered ruling, except that a ruling or reconsidered ruling that related to a determination that is reconsidered pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1332 may also be reconsidered by the department within the time provided for reconsideration of that determination.

(c) For purposes of this section only, if the claimant voluntarily leaves the employer’s employ without notification to the employer of the reasons therefor, and if the employer submits all of the facts within its possession concerning the leaving within the applicable time period referred to in this section, the leaving shall be presumed to be without good cause.

(d) An individual whose employment is terminated under the compulsory retirement provisions of a collective bargaining agreement to which the
 employer is a party shall not be deemed to have voluntarily left their employment without good cause.

(e) Rulings under this section shall have the effect prescribed by Section 1032.

(f) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2015.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 67, Sec. 37.   (SB 191)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3702.

Extended duration benefits, to the extent that such extended duration benefits are not reimbursed or reimbursable by the federal government to the State of California, shall be charged except as provided by Section 1032, 1032.5, 1034, 1036, 1335, 1338, or 1380, against the reserve account of the exhaustee’s employer during his or her base period. If the individual performed services in employment for more than one employer during his or her base period, unemployment compensation benefits paid to him or her shall be charged against the respective reserve accounts of such employers in the proportion that the total wages paid to the individual in employment for each employer bears to the total wages paid to the individual in employment for all employers during the base period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1169, Sec. 8.)